Tennessee, session 114, HB2300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-104, is amended by deleting
subdivision (10) and substituting instead the following:
(10) "Economically disadvantaged" means:
(A) As defined in Tennessee's Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) plan
established pursuant to the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (20 U.S.C. §
6301 et seq.), a homeless, foster, runaway, or migrant student;
(B) A student eligible for free or reduced-price school meals or milk
through the direct certification eligibility guidelines established pursuant to 42
U.S.C. §§ 1751-1769; or
(C) A student who is enrolled in the state's medicaid program;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to TISA allocations for the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter.
HB2300
008948
- 1 -